Utah statutes.
53-1-111.   Crime prevention month -- Department of Public Safety to
coordinate.
(1)  The month of October is designated as "Crime Prevention Month."
(2)  The department shall coordinate all activities, special programs, and
promotional information to heighten public awareness and involvement in the
prevention of crime in each community.
